Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-705
Terms; rate of interest.

The bonds issued under sections 10-701 to 10-716 shall draw such interest as shall be agreed upon.

Laws 1879, § 6, p. 171;

Laws 1907, c. 130, § 1, p. 430;

R.S.1913, § 452;

C.S.1922, § 369;

C.S.1929, § 11-905;

R.S.1943, § 10-705;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 14, p. 282.